Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. Local Boards of Social Services.

§ 63.2-300.
Local boards established by local governments.

There shall be a local board in each county and city of the Commonwealth. However, any combination of counties and cities may establish one local board for those jurisdictions as hereinafter provided in this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-51; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1968, cc. 578, 584, § 63.1-38; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to department and board of social services under the county manager form of government, see §

15.2-626

. As to department and board of social services under the urban county executive form of government, see §

15.2-835

.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

Law Review.

For article, “Welfare Reform and Local Administration of Aid to Families with Dependent Children in Virginia,” see 57 Va. L. Rev. 818 (1971).

For discussion of Bockes v. Fields, 999 F.2d 788 (4th Cir. 1993).

which addresses Eleventh Amendment immunity of local social service boards, see “ The Fourth Circuit Review,” 51 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 331 (1994).

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).

§ 63.2-301.
Local board appointments and terms of office.

The members of each local board first appointed shall be appointed initially for terms of from one to four years so as to provide for the balanced overlapping of the terms of the membership thereon and the members of a local board representing more than one county or city shall be appointed initially for such terms, of not less than one nor more than four years, as may be determined by the governing bodies of their respective counties or cities. Subsequent appointments shall be for a term of four years each, except that appointments to fill vacancies that occur during terms shall be for the remainder of those unexpired terms. Appointments to fill unexpired terms shall not be considered full terms, and such persons shall be eligible to be appointed to two consecutive full terms. No person may serve more than two consecutive full terms; however, this section shall not apply to a member of a local board who is also a member of the board of supervisors for a county represented by the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors of which he is a member or until such time as he ceases to be a member of the board of supervisors, or in cases in which a local government official is constituted to be the local board. A member of a local board who serves two consecutive full terms shall be ineligible for reappointment to such local board until the end of an intervening two-year period dating from the expiration of the last of the two consecutive terms.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-56; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1968, cc. 467, 578, § 63.1-39; 1974, c. 120; 1975, c. 300; 1980, c. 377; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 16; 2014, cc. 95, 121.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 16, substituted “two-year” for “four-year” in the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 95 and 121 are identical, and substituted “to a member of a local board who is also a member of the board of supervisors for a county represented by the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of supervisors of which he is a member or until such time as he ceases to be a member of the board of supervisors, or in cases in which” for “where” in the fourth sentence.

§ 63.2-302.
How local board for a single county is constituted.

The local board serving a single county shall be, at the discretion of the governing body of the county, either a local government official or a local board consisting of residents of the county who are, except as provided in §

63.2-303

, appointed by the governing body of the county. If residents of the county constitute the local board, such board shall consist of three or more members. The governing body shall appoint a member of the board of supervisors to be one member of the local board, except in those cases where the board of supervisors has determined otherwise. When a member of the board of supervisors who was appointed as a member of the local board ceases to be a member of the board of supervisors, his office as a member of the local board shall also be vacated and another member of the board of supervisors shall be appointed to fill such vacancy.

If a local government official constitutes the local board, he may designate a senior staff person in the local department to act in his behalf, in his absence, to approve, cancel or change grants made under the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-52, 63-54, 63-56; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1966, c. 258; 1968, cc. 467, 578, § 63.1-40; 1970, c. 465; 1972, cc. 147, 714; 1984, c. 586; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law on taxation, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 291 (2005).

§ 63.2-303.
Local boards in counties having special forms of county government.

Where the statutes dealing with special forms of county government provide for the appointment of local boards, the provisions of such statutes shall control.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-60; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-41; 1970, cc. 465, 467; 1981, c. 90; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-304.
How local board of a city is constituted.

The local board serving a single city shall be, at the discretion of the city council, either a local government official or a local board consisting of five members appointed by the city council of such city in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-301

. The city council may appoint one of its members to the local board. When a member of the city council who was appointed as a member of the local board ceases to be a member of the city council, his office as a member of the local board shall also be vacated and another member of the city council may be appointed to fill the vacancy.

If a local government official constitutes the local board, he may designate a senior staff person in the local department to act in his behalf, in his absence, with respect to approving, cancelling or changing grants made under the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-53.1; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1958, c. 195; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-43; 1977, c. 36; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 84, 158.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 84 and 158 are identical, and added the second and third sentences in the first paragraph.

§ 63.2-305.
Advisory boards.

If the governing body of a city or county or the governing bodies of any combination of cities and counties participating in a district designate, under the provisions of §§

63.2-302

,

63.2-304

or §

63.2-307

, a local government official as constituting the local board, such governing body or bodies shall appoint a board to serve in an advisory capacity to such local government official with respect to the duties and functions imposed upon him by this title.Each such advisory board shall consist of no fewer than five and no more than thirteen members. In the case of an advisory board established for a district, there shall be at least one member on the board from each county and city in the district. The members shall be appointed initially for terms of from one to four years so as to provide for the balanced overlapping of the terms of the membership thereon. Subsequent appointments shall be for a term of four years each, except that appointments to fill vacancies that occur during terms shall be for the remainder of these unexpired terms. Appointments to fill unexpired terms shall not be considered full terms, and such persons shall be eligible to be appointed to two consecutive full terms. No person shall serve more than two consecutive full terms. The local government official shall be an ex officio member, without vote, of the advisory board.The advisory board shall elect its own chairman and shall meet at least bimonthly. In addition to regularly scheduled meetings, it may meet at the call of the chairman or on the petition of at least one-half of the members.

The powers and duties of the advisory board shall be:

To interest itself in all matters pertaining to the public assistance and social services needed by people of the political subdivision or subdivisions served by the local department;

To monitor the formulation and implementation of public assistance and social services programs by the local department;

To meet with the local government official who constitutes the local board at least four times a year for the purpose of making recommendations on policy matters concerning the local department;

To make an annual report to the governing body or bodies, concurrent with the budget presentation of the local department, concerning the administration of the public assistance and social services programs; and

To submit to the governing body or bodies, from time to time, other reports that the advisory board deems appropriate.

History.

1977, c. 36, § 63.1-43.1; 1981, c. 264; 1984, c. 586; 1989, c. 356; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-306.
Local boards established by two or more political subdivisions.

The provisions of §§

63.2-302

and

63.2-304

notwithstanding, the Board, with the prior consent of the Governor, may establish districts consisting of two or more counties or cities or combinations of cities and counties. Except as provided in §

63.2-307

, there shall be one district board of not less than three nor more than nine members for each such district. There shall be at least one member of the district board from each county and city in the district. Additional representation from one or more counties or cities within the stipulated maximum may be determined by the Board, with population being the principal factor in such determination. Appointments to the district board shall be made by the governing body of each county and city in the district, upon certification of the establishment of such district by the Board. The Board shall designate the initial term of each district board member to be not less than one nor more than four years in duration, so as to provide for a balanced overlapping of terms. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of four years each, except appointments to fill a vacancy, which shall be for the unexpired term. Appointments to fill unexpired terms shall not be considered full terms, and such persons shall be eligible to be appointed to two consecutive full terms. No member shall serve for more than two consecutive full terms. A member who serves two consecutive full terms shall be ineligible for reappointment to the district board until the end of an intervening one-year period dating from the expiration of the last of the two consecutive terms. Before requesting the Governor’s approval for establishment of any such district, the Board shall consult with the governing body of each county or city that would be included in the district. No county or city shall be included in any such district served by one board unless the local governing body so elects. The district board of any district consisting of two or more counties or cities or combinations of counties and cities shall be considered to be a local board.

Administrative costs of a district board shall be borne by the participating local governments on the basis of population and case load with equal weight being given to each factor or in such manner as the respective governing bodies provide by agreement.

In cases in which a district board includes a county, a member of the board of supervisors of such county may be a member of the local board.

In cases in which a district board includes a city, a member of the council of such city may be a member of the local board, notwithstanding any provision of the charter of any city in force on March 4, 1971.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-51; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1968, cc. 578, 584, § 63.1-44; 1970, c. 465; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 138; 1973, c. 201; 1980, cc. 377, 383; 1989, c. 356; 1992, c. 169; 1996, c. 481; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth for certain expenditures, see §

63.2-401

.

As to payment of public assistance by the district fiscal officer when two or more counties or cities have been combined to form a district pursuant to §

63.2-306

, see §

63.2-520

.

§ 63.2-306.1.
Withdrawal from district boards of social services.

The governing body of any county or city that has combined with one or more other counties or cities to establish a district board pursuant to §

63.2-306

may withdraw from such district board and establish a local board in accordance with a transition plan approved by the Board.

The governing body of a county or city that wishes to withdraw from a district board shall adopt a resolution stating the local governing body’s intent to withdraw from the district board and setting forth the terms and conditions of a transition plan for the withdrawal from the district board and establishment of a local board by the local governing body. Such resolution shall be communicated to the Board and all other counties and cities participating in the district board.

The transition plan required pursuant to subsection B shall include provisions related to:

Establishment of a local board, including appointment of members to such local board;

Withdrawal from the district board, including payment of any outstanding obligations by the local governing body to the district board and transfer of any property or funds from the district board to the local board;

Transfer of financial and administrative powers and duties from the district board to the local board;

Continued provision of social services in accordance with laws of the Commonwealth and regulations of the Board; and

Any other matters necessary to accomplish the withdrawal of the local governing body from the district board.The transition plan shall also include a timeline for establishment of the local board and withdrawal of the local governing body from the district board and shall state whether the local governing body intends to withdraw from any single department of social services established by the local governing bodies of the counties or cities participating in the district board.

Whenever the Board fails or refuses to approve the terms and conditions of a transition plan submitted pursuant to subsection B, the county or city seeking to withdraw from a district board may petition the circuit court of the county or city for approval of the transition plan. The Board, the district board, and the counties and cities participating in the district board shall be named as parties in such action. The circuit court may approve a transition plan for the withdrawal of a county or city from a district board and establishment of a local board subject to such transition plan with such terms and conditions that the court may deem appropriate.

History.

2014, c. 119.

§ 63.2-307.
Local boards serving certain districts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

63.2-306

:

The local board for the York County and City of Poquoson district may be, at the discretion of the governing bodies of the participating city and county, the local director. If such local director serves as the local board, he may designate a senior staff person in the local department to act on his behalf, in his absence, to approve, cancel or change grants made under the provisions of this title.

At the discretion of the governing bodies of the participating cities and counties, the local board for a district may be composed of the chief administrative officer of each political subdivision, who may designate his principal assistant to act on his behalf, in his absence, to approve, cancel or change grants made under the provisions of this title.In addition, the provisions of §

63.2-305

shall apply.

History.

1989, c. 356, § 63.1-44.1; 1995, cc. 262, 313; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-308.
Suspension or removal of members.

Members of any local board may be suspended or removed for cause by the Board or by the local governing body authorized to appoint the members of the local board.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-57; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-45; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For discussion of Bockes v. Fields, 999 F.2d 788 (4th Cir. 1993).

which addresses Eleventh Amendment immunity of local social service boards, see “ The Fourth Circuit Review,” 51 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 331 (1994).

§ 63.2-309.
Quorum.

A majority of the members of any local board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-58; 1952, c. 409; 1956, c. 126; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-46; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-310.
Compensation and expenses.

Each member of the local board of a county or a city or of a district shall be paid his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in attendance at meetings and while otherwise engaged in the discharge of his duties. In addition to such expenses, the governing body of each city or county may, out of its general fund, pay to each member of the local board, as compensation for his services, an amount to be fixed by the governing body of such city or county. No such county or city shall be reimbursed out of either state or federal funds for any part of such compensation paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-59; 1954, c. 258; 1962, c. 491; 1966, c. 478; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-47; 1972, c. 11; 1973, c. 201; 1978, c. 754; 1998, cc. 80, 192; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to department and board of social services under the county manager form of government, see §

15.2-626

.

§ 63.2-311.
Fiscal officer for district board; compensation of such officer.

Whenever two or more political subdivisions establish a district pursuant to §

63.2-306

there shall be appointed a district fiscal officer for such district board. The district fiscal officer shall perform all the fiscal functions for the district board that had been previously performed for the local board by the treasurer or other fiscal officer of each locality within the district. The district fiscal officer for such district board shall be the treasurer of one of the participating counties or cities or combination of counties and cities, as mutually agreed upon by the district board with the approval of the governing bodies. In the event the local authorities cannot agree on the selection of a district fiscal officer, the Commissioner shall designate such district fiscal officer. For his services as district fiscal officer, the treasurer shall be paid such salary as may be agreed upon by the district board. In the event the district board and the treasurer so designated cannot agree on such compensation, then the amount of salary to be paid shall be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction and the amount so fixed by the judge shall be binding upon both the treasurer and the district board. Provided, that nothing contained in this section shall affect the regular salary or expense allowance of the treasurer as fixed annually by the State Compensation Board.

History.

1973, c. 201, § 63.1-47.1; 1974, cc. 44, 45, 503; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-312.
Meetings; organization; chairman and vice-chairman; secretary.

The governing body or bodies shall immediately notify the members of the local board of their appointment, and such members shall, within fifteen days after their notification, elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among their number. The local board shall meet at least bimonthly and on other occasions on call of the chairman or in pursuance of action by the local board. At least one such meeting a year shall be an orientation and training session for local board members. The local director shall act as secretary of his local board and shall keep on file minutes of the attendance and transactions at all meetings of the local board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-61, 63-62, 63-64; 1952, c. 409; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-48; 1975, c. 190; 1978, c. 754; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-313.
Administration of law.

The local boards shall, subject to the regulations of the Board, administer the applicable provisions of this title in their respective counties and cities. The local boards shall also administer the applicable provisions of Chapter 14 (§

51.5-116

et seq.) of Title 51.5 pursuant to the regulations of the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-66; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-50; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 62 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

63.2-100

,

63.2-313

,

63.2-315

,

63.2-405

,

63.2-1600

,

63.2-1601

,

63.2-1602

,

63.2-1605

, and

63.2-1606

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and added the last sentence.

§ 63.2-314.
Funds received from public or private sources; authority of local governing bodies to make grants; authority of local boards to establish regulations and fees for court ordered services.

The local boards are authorized to receive and disburse funds derived from public grants or private sources in the form of gifts, contributions, bequests or legacies for the purpose of aiding needy persons within their respective counties, cities or districts. The governing bodies of counties and cities are authorized to make public grants hereunder to their respective local boards. Eligibility for aid from these sources need not be limited to requirements established for the public assistance programs in this Commonwealth. All funds received from such sources shall be deposited in the treasuries of the respective county, city or local district board to the credit of the county, city or local district board and dispensed as authorized by such county, city or local district board.

Local boards may establish regulations and fee schedules and may receive fees for services that a court directs a local department to perform pursuant to § 16.1-274.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-66.1; 1954, c. 269; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-51; 1972, c. 387; 1973, c. 201; 1975, c. 125; 1976, c. 516; 1993, c. 975; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-315.
Furnishing reports.

The local boards shall furnish to the Commissioner and the governing body of its county or city such reports relating to the administration of this title as the Commissioner and such governing body, respectively, may require. The local boards shall furnish such reports relating to the administration of applicable provisions of Chapter 14 (§

51.5-116

et seq.) of Title 51.5 to the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, as may be required.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-67, 63-67.1, 63-67.2; 1950, p. 641; 1954, c. 265; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-52; 1984, c. 498; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 62 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

63.2-100

,

63.2-313

,

63.2-315

,

63.2-405

,

63.2-1600

,

63.2-1601

,

63.2-1602

,

63.2-1605

, and

63.2-1606

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and added the last sentence.

§ 63.2-316.
Submission of budget to governing bodies.

The local boards shall submit annually to the boards of supervisors or city councils of their respective counties and cities a budget, containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out the provisions of this title, and a copy thereof shall be forwarded to the Commissioner, subject to the provisions of §

63.2-205

.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-69; 1952, c. 409; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-54; 1975, c. 368; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-317.
Employment of counsel for local boards and employees; payment of expenses.

Except in those cases in which the attorney for the Commonwealth or county or city attorney represents the local board, a local board may employ legal counsel in civil matters to give advice to or represent the local board or any of its members or the employees of the local department and may pay court costs and other expenses involved in the conduct of such civil matters from funds appropriated by the local governing body for the administration of the local department. Such counsel may be employed on a part-time basis for any particular action or actions. A local board may employ in-house counsel to provide general legal advice and representation and advice related to specific actions. However, prior approval of the Department shall be obtained by the local board before counsel is employed except in instances where legal counsel is necessary for the provision of services or assistance to eligible recipients under this title.

The Department may reimburse the local board for all or any part of such expenditures at the same rate in effect for all other administrative costs at the time of the expenditure. However, the Department shall not reimburse the local board for any expenses for which payment was available through an insurance policy currently in force.

Where such counsel is employed by the local board, the attorney for the Commonwealth or city attorney or county attorney may be relieved of his responsibility to represent the local board or local department in that matter.

History.

1976, c. 382, § 63.1-54.1; 1977, c. 184; 1985, c. 438; 2002, c. 747; 2014, cc. 122, 536.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 122 and 536 are identical, and in the first paragraph added the third sentence.

§ 63.2-318.
Payment of legal fees and expenses for certain local department employees.

If any employee of a local department is arrested, indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any criminal charge arising out of an act committed in the discharge of his official duties, and the charge is subsequently terminated by entry of an order of dismissal, or nolle prosequi or upon trial he is found not guilty, the local board by which he is employed may reimburse such employee for all or part of the legal fees and expenses incurred by the employee in defense of such charge. The Department may reimburse the local board all or any part of such expenditures at the same rate in effect for all other administrative costs at the time of the expenditure to the extent that funds are available.

History.

1977, c. 82, § 63.1-54.2; 1985, c. 438; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-319.
Child welfare and other services.

Each local board shall provide, either directly or through the purchase of services subject to the supervision of the Commissioner and in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, any or all child welfare services herein described when such services are not available through other agencies serving residents in the locality. For purposes of this section, the term “child welfare services” means public social services that are directed toward:

Protecting the welfare of all children including handicapped, homeless, dependent, or neglected children;

Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems that may result in the neglect, abuse, exploitation or delinquency of children;

Preventing the unnecessary separation of children from their families by identifying family problems, assisting families in resolving these problems and preventing the break up of the family where preventing the removal of a child is desirable and possible;

Restoring to their families children who have been removed by providing services to the families and children;

Placing children in suitable adoptive homes in cases where restoration to the biological family is not possible or appropriate; and

Assuring adequate care of children away from their homes in cases where they cannot be returned home or placed for adoption.Each local board is also authorized and, as may be provided by regulations of the Board, shall provide rehabilitation and other services to help individuals attain or retain self-care or self-support and such services as are likely to prevent or reduce dependency and, in the case of dependent children, to maintain and strengthen family life.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-72.1; 1966, c. 593; 1968, cc. 466, 578, § 63.1-55; 1973, c. 122; 1977, c. 634; 1982, c. 171; 1984, c. 781; 1986, c. 281; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth for certain expenditures, see §

63.2-401

.

As to authority of the State Board of Social Services upon amendments of the federal Social Security Act or regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services, see §

63.2-406

.

As to local boards of social services accepting persons under 18 years of age for placement in homes, facilities, etc., see §

63.2-900

.

As to permanent foster care placements, see §

63.2-908

. As to petition for relief of care and custody, see § 16.1-277.02.

§ 63.2-320.
Accepting and expending certain funds on behalf of children placed by or entrusted to local board when no guardian appointed; disposition of funds when children discharged.

A local board is authorized and empowered to accept and expend on behalf of and for the benefit of any child placed by it where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians, committed or entrusted to its care under §§

63.2-900

and

63.2-903

, when no guardian has been appointed, funds or money paid or tendered as pension, compensation, insurance or other benefit from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or under the Railroad Retirement Act or the old age and survivors’ insurance provisions of the Social Security Act, as amended, or funds contributed or paid by parents or other persons for the support of such child, and the local board may, from any such funds received, provide for the current or future maintenance of such child.

Whenever any child is discharged by the local board all such funds held by the local board shall be paid to the child’s guardian if such funds exceed $1,000 upon such guardian posting bond as may be required by law, or disbursed in accordance with §

8.01-606

, if the sum does not exceed $1,000.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-73.1; 1954, c. 224; 1958, c. 239; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-57; 1994, c. 865; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” was substituted for “Veterans’ Administration.”

§ 63.2-321.
Interest in and cooperation for public assistance and social services; directing local director.

It shall be the duty of each local board to interest itself in all matters pertaining to the public assistance and social services needed by people of the political subdivision or subdivisions served by the local department, to direct the activities of the local director and to cooperate with the juvenile and domestic relations courts and all other agencies operating for the social betterment of the community.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-72; 1952, c. 409; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-57.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-322.
Conducting hearings, issuing subpoenas, etc.

Local boards in the exercise and performance of their functions, duties and powers under the provisions of this title are authorized to hold and conduct hearings, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, memoranda, papers and other documents, to administer oaths and to take testimony thereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-74; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-58; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

For penalty for failing or refusing to obey a subpoena issued under this section, see §

63.2-106

.

§ 63.2-323.
Emergency payments.

In emergency situations or in the event of delay or error in a state issuance of payments for public assistance and social services to eligible recipients, or expenditures for administration and services, emergency payments shall be issued by local boards as authorized by Board regulations. In emergency situations that result from lost or stolen checks, the Department shall assume liability for losses incurred by local boards due to fraudulent acts by recipients; however, the local board shall make diligent efforts to recoup any such lost funds in accordance with Board regulations.

History.

1975, c. 336, § 63.1-58.1; 1978, c. 296; 2002, c. 747.